Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.210

Notice of intent to demand payment.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must (a) deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of the shareholder's intent to demand payment for the shareholder's shares if the proposed corporate action is effected, and (b) not vote such shares in favor of the proposed corporate action.

(2) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 does not require shareholder approval pursuant to *RCW 23B.11A.040, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights with respect to any class or series of shares:

(a) Shall deliver to the corporation before the shares are purchased pursuant to the offer under *RCW 23B.11A.040 written notice of the shareholder's intent to demand payment for the shareholder's shares if the proposed corporate action is effected; and

(b) Shall not tender, or cause to be tendered, any shares of such class or series in response to such offer.

(3) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is submitted for approval without a vote of shareholders in accordance with RCW 23B.07.040, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must not execute the consent or otherwise vote such shares in favor of the proposed corporate action.

(4) A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section is not entitled to payment for the shareholder's shares under this chapter.

[2024 c 22 s 24; 2022 c 42 s 115; 2020 c 57 s 69; 2009 c 189 s 43; 2002 c 297 s 37; 1989 c 165 s 144.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 23B.11A.040 appears to be erroneous. RCW 23B.11A.045 was apparently intended.